src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON DIEDUT !!≈ * **@CODE@** like ALBMI but plural only
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 :%> EssV ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k K ;
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:%>X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ; not very plausible
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ži%> MALLASI-/NUORABUj- ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6ži%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6ža%>t K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»X6ža%>k K ;


LEXICON BORALMASAT !!≈ * **@CODE@** like JOHTOLAT but plural only
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
!+Sg+Gen:a%>X4 K ;
! +Cmp/SgGen:a%>X4 R ;	!Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! +Sg+Gen:a%>X4 NPx3V ; !^P^
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Ess:a%>n%> NPxC ;
 :a DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! :a DenominalAdjsV2 ;		!not very plausible
 +Pl+Nom:a%>X4t K ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Nom:a%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:a%>X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:a%>X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:a%>X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:a%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:a%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:a%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:a%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:a%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ži%> MALLASI-/NUORABUj- ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:a»X6ži%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:a»X6ža%>t K ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:a»X6žijddá%> NPx1V ;

LEXICON DURVAT !!≈ * **@CODE@** like LASIS but pl. only
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 flagOFF-R ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>Y5t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>Y5jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>Y5jd R ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>Y5jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>Y5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>Y5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>Y5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>Y5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>Y5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>Y5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>Y5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:%>Y5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:%>Y5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>Y5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:%>Y5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>Y5jn%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:»X6ži%> MALLASI-/NUORABUj- ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»Y5ži%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5ža%>t K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5ža%>t K ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5ži%>jddá%> NPx1V ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;






!! Trisyllabic nouns
!!!!! 1. DEFAULT SECTION
! - - - - - - - - -



LEXICON MATTAR !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms Tris. Anim. Gradating C-Nouns
 MALIS ;

LEXICON MALIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
 :%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X8 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X4 DenominalAdjsCShort ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X8 GEAHTES ;
!+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:až»X2 DIMINC ; !redundant
!+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:až»X2 DIMINC ; !redundant

LEXICON MALIS_CGforms !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Long compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;


LEXICON MALISLONG !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Long compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X4 DenominalAdjsCLong ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X4 GEAHTES ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:až»X2 DIMINC ; !redundant

LEXICON MALISLONGSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Long and short compound-forms. Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X8 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X4 DenominalAdjsC ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X8 GEAHTES ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X4 GEAHTES ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:až»X2 DIMINC ; !redundant



LEXICON BEANA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Anim. Gradating 0-Nouns
 SEAMU ;

LEXICON SEAMU !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns
 :%>X4 BOAZU-NE ; !NE
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON SEAMU_CGforms !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;


LEXICON SEAMULONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +Ess:%>X4n%> NPxC ;
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;


LEXICON GAHPIR !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
                    +Sg+Nom:         K                   ;
                 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7     flagON-R            ; ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
                 +Cmp/SgNom:%>       flagOFF-R           ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K                   ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K                   ;
                       +Ess:%>in     K                   ;
                           :%>       MALLAS-             ; ! GAI, NPx, NPl
                                     DenominalNounsC     ;
                                     DenominalAdjsCShort ;
                  +Use/-PLX:%>X7     GEAHTES             ;
                +Err/DerSub:         KEAHTTA-PRED        ;


LEXICON GAHPIRLONGSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** Long and short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;    ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 :%> MALLAS- ;		! GAI, NPx, NPl
   DenominalNounsC ;
   DenominalAdjsC ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X7 GEAHTES ;
 +Use/NG+Use/-PLX: GEAHTES ;
 +Err/DerSub: KEAHTTA-PRED ;
