src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
poteteskeallir+N+Sem/Build-room+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:potetes#kealºlir MALISLONGSHORT ; !LIA
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
allalávlla+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Prod-audio:alla#lávllag8 SEAMU_CGforms ;
bargiiddieđut+N+Sem/Dummytag:bargiid9#diehºtu DIEDUT ;
biilastivrran+N+Sem/Dummytag:biila#stivrran GAHPIR ;
bohccobázahusat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:bohcco#bázahuss BORALMASAT ;
bonus+N+Sem/Tool:botnus MALIS_CGforms ;
bruttobuvttadanboađus+N+Sem/Semcon:brutto#buvttadan#boahºtus MALISLONG "share N" ;
buđetkeallir+N+Sem/Build-room:buđet#kealºlir MALISLONGSHORT ;
bábir+v2+N+Dial/-GG+Sem/Mat_Txt:báhºpir MALIS ; !OK
báŋkogunddar+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:báŋko#gunºdar MATTAR ;
davvespiinnut+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plant:davve#spiinnuh GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
doavttir+N+Sem/Hum_Pos+Err/Orth:doavttir MALIS_CGforms ;
dukta+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Substnc:dukºtag8 SEAMU_CGforms ;
duohtadieđut+N+Sem/Dummytag:duohta#diehºtu DIEDUT ;
duolbaluovččan+N+Sem/Dummytag:duolba#luovččan GAHPIR ;
duopmocealkka+N+Sem/Prod-ling:duopmo#cealºkag8 SEAMU ;
durvát+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:durºvis DURVAT ;
eahkedaččat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:eahke7dažž BORALMASAT ;
eallonisu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:eallo#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
ealáhusdieđut+N+Sem/Dummytag:ealáhus#diehºtu DIEDUT ;
eanaháldengielddus+N+Sem/Rule:eana#hálden#gielºdus MALISLONG ;
faláštallanbiras+N+Sem/Plc-abstr:faláštallan#birras MALIS ;
fysihkar+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:fysihkkar MATTAR ;
fárfočála+N+Sem/Txt:fárfo#čállag8 BEANA ;
gilon+N+Sem/Dummytag:gilom GAHPIR ;
guikkut+N+Sem/Dummytag:guikkuh GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
guora+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:guorrag8 SEAMU ;
guovlluáirras+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Hum_Pos:guovlo#ájºras MATTAR ;
gutnabivttas+N+Sem/Clth:gutna#bikºtas MALIS ;
gáneš+N+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:gánež MALIS_CGforms ;
gárdevaris+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gárde#varris MALISLONG ;
gávpotnisu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gávpot#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
heaggadieđut+N+Sem/Dummytag:heagga#diehºtu DIEDUT ;
huksenbázahusat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:huksen#bázahuss BORALMASAT ;
hásselsábin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:hássel#sáhºpin MALISLONGSHORT ;
háŋgil+N+Sem/Dummytag:háŋgil GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
iešdieđut+N+Sem/Dummytag:ieš#diehºtu DIEDUT ;
imaš+N+Sem/Act+Err/Orth:imaž MALIS_CGforms ;
iđđedislávlla+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Prod-audio:iđđedis#lávllag8 SEAMU_CGforms ;
jiehkkoheavval+N+Sem/Tool:jiehkko#heavval GAHPIR ;
kvalitehtabábur+N+Sem/Txt:kvalitehta#báhºpur MALIS ;
listááirras+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:listá#ájºras MATTAR ;
loddenbeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:lodden#beatnag8 BEANA ;
lohkogeažus+N+Sem/Cat:lohko#geahºčus MALISLONG ;
lassedoaibmadoarjja+N+Sem/Money:lasse#doaibma#doarºjag8 SEAMU ;
meroštallannjuolggadusat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:meroštallan#njuolggaduss BORALMASAT ;
mihtádusdieđut+N+Sem/Dummytag:mihtádus#diehºtu DIEDUT ;
moksin+N+Sem/Dummytag:moksim GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
nationálalávlla+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Err/Orth:našunála#lávllag8 SEAMU_CGforms ;
neavttár+N+Sem/Hum_Pos+Err/Orth:neakºtár MALIS_CGforms ;
njenecanisu+N+Sem/Hum+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:njeneca#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
nuoraidáirras+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:nuoraid9#ájºras MATTAR ;
oađáldagat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Obj-clo:oađáldahºk BORALMASAT ;
oktasaščoavddus+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:oktasaš#čoavºdus MALISLONG ;
opmodatjiekŋudanrusttet+N+Sem/Tool:opmodat#jiekŋudan#rustteg GAHPIR ;
ovttahatolbmot+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ovttahat#olbmož DURVAT ;
penšundivat+N+Sem/Money+Err/Orth:penšun#divvad MALIS_CGforms ;
poahtalčotta+N+Sem/Dummytag:poahtal#čoddag8 SEAMU ;
rossičuonjá+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:rossi#čuotnjág8 BEANA ;
ruksessábin+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:rukses#sáhºpin MALISLONGSHORT ;
ruoivát+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:ruojºvis DURVAT ;
ruovttubiras+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:ruovttu#birras MALIS ;
ruoššanisu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ruošša#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
ráhppát+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:ráhppis DURVAT ;
sirdolaiggus+N+Sem/Dummytag:sirdo#lajºgus MALISLONG ;
skeptihkar+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:skeptihkkar MATTAR ;
skihpáraččat+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:skihpáražž BORALMASAT ;
spažut+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:spažuh GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
vahátbuhtadusortnet+N+Sem/Rule:vahát#buhtadus#ortneg GAHPIR ;
valmuesiema+N+Sem/Plantpart:valmue#siepman8 BEANA ;
veađahatráhppát+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:veađahat#ráhppis DURVAT ;
viidnegeallir+N+Sem/Build-room:viidne#gealºlir MALISLONGSHORT ;
vuodjengoartaráva+N+Sem/Dummytag:vuodjen#goarta#rávvag8 SEAMU ;
áhpenuohttunfanas+N+Sem/Veh:áhpe#nuohttun#fatnas MALIS ;
álbmotlašlávlla+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Prod-audio:álbmotlaš#lávllag8 SEAMU_CGforms ;
čáhppesčuonjá+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:čáhppes#čuotnjág8 BEANA ;
šlávanisu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:šláva#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
